en: Thick apple syrups
nl: Appelstropen

en: Thick apple pear syrups
nl: Appel-perenstropen

en: Concentrate syrup without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
fr: Boisson concentrée à diluer sans sucres ajoutés avec édulcorants, Sirop concentré à diluer sans sucres ajoutés avec édulcorants

en: Syrup with sugar to be diluted
fr: Sirop à diluer sucré

en: Simple syrups
ca: Xarops simples
de: Einfache Sirupe
es: Siropes simples, Jarabes simples
fi: Yksinkertaiset siirapit
fr: Sirops simples
he: סירופים פשוטים
hr: Jednostavni sirupi
it: Sciroppi semplici
nl: Basissiropen
pt: Xaropes simples

en: Agave syrups, Agave nectars
bg: Агаве сироп
de: Agavensäfte
es: Siropes de agave
fi: agavesiirappi
fr: Sirops d'agave
hr: Agavini sirupi
it: Sciroppi d'agave
ja: アガベシロップ
nl: Agavesiropen
zh: 龙舌兰糖浆

en: Birch syrups
es: Siropes de abedul, Melazas de abedul, Jarabes de abedul
fr: Sirops de bouleau
hr: Sirupi od breze
nl: Berkensiropen

en: Cereal syrups
de: Getreidesirups
es: Siropes de cereales, Jarabes de cereales, Melazas de cereales
fr: Sirops de céréales, sirop de céréales
hr: Sirupi od žitarica
it: Sciroppi di cereali
nl: Graansiropen

en: Barley malt syrup
bg: Сироп ечемичен малц
de: Gerstenmalzsirup
es: Siropes de cebada malteada, Jarabes de cebada malteada
fr: Sirops d'orge malté, sirop d'orge malté
hr: Sirup od ječmenog slada
nl: Gerstemoutstropen

en: Rice syrups, Brown rice syrups
de: Reissirupe
es: Sirope de arroz, Jarabe de arroz, Jarabe de arroz marrón, Melazas de arroz
fr: Sirops de riz, Sirops de riz brun, sirop de riz
hr: Rižini sirupi
it: Sciroppi di riso, Sciroppo di riso
nl: Bruine rijststropen

en: Corn syrups
de: Maissirups
es: Siropes de maíz, Jarabes de maíz
fr: Sirops de maïs, sirop de maïs
hr: Kukuruzni sirupi
it: Sciroppi di mais
ja: コーンシロップ
nl: Maisstropen

en: High fructose corn syrups
es: Siropes de maíz de alta fructosa, Jarabes de maíz de alta fructosa, Almíbar de maíz de alta fructosa
fr: Sirops de maïs à haute teneur en fructose
hr: Kukuruzni sirupi s visokim udjelom fruktoze
ja: 異性化糖, 果糖ブドウ糖液糖
nl: Maisstropen met hoog fructosegehalte

en: Quinoa syrups
es: Siropes de quinoa
fr: Sirops de quinoa, sirop de quinoa
hr: Sirupi od kvinoje
it: Sciroppi di quinoa
nl: Quinoastropen

en: Wheat syrups
es: Siropes de trigo, Melazas de trigo
fr: Sirops de blé, sirop de blé
hr: Pšenični sirupi
it: Sciroppi di grano
nl: Tarwestropen

en: Spelt syrups
es: Siropes de espelta, Melazas de espelta
fr: Sirops d'épeautre, sirop d'épeautre
hr: Sirupi od pira
nl: Speltstropen

en: Coconut blossom syrups, coconut flower syrups
fr: Sirops de fleur de coco

en: Date syrups, Date honeys, Date molasses
ar: رب تمر
da: Daddelsirupper
de: Dattelhonig
eo: Daktilsiropoj
es: Miel de dátil
fa: شیره خرما
fi: Taatelisiirappi
fr: Sirops de datte, mélasses de datte
he: סירופ תמרים
hr: Sirupi od datulja
id: Madu kurma
ig: Mmanụ aṅụ
it: Miele di datteri
ja: デーツシロップ
ko: 대추야자 꿀
nl: Dadelsiropen, Dadelsiroop, Dadelhoning
ru: Финиковый мёд
sl: Datljev sirup
sv: Dadelsiraper
uk: Фініковий мед

en: Pekmez
fr: Pekmez

en: Maple syrups
de: Ahornsirups
es: Siropes de arce, Jarabes de arce
fi: vaahterasiirapit
fr: Sirops d'érable, sirop d'érable
hr: Javorovi sirupi
it: Sciroppo d'acero
ja: メープルシロップ
nl: Esdoornstropen
pl: Syrop klonowy
ru: Кленовые сиропы

en: Maple syrups from Québec
fr: Sirops d’érable du Québec
hr: Javorov sirup iz Québeca
nl: Esdoornstropen uit Quebec